Utah statutes.
7-8-12.   Charge off of losses sustained on receivables and operating losses
-- Replenishment of surplus account.
(1) (a)  Losses sustained  on receivables by an industrial bank shall be
charged first to the industrial bank's reserve for losses and  then to its
current income.
(b)  Operating losses shall be charged first to the industrial bank's current
income, next to undivided profits and then, after undivided profits have been
exhausted, to the surplus account.
(2)  A charge to the industrial bank's surplus account shall be replenished
from net profits or capital contributions.  The industrial bank may declare or
pay a dividend only with the written permission of the commissioner until its
surplus account reaches an amount prescribed by the commissioner in writing.
